Utah statutes.
63C-6-104.   Staffing and appropriated funds.

(1)  Staff support to the commission shall be provided by the Division of Homeland Security and the Utah Geological Survey.

(2)  Monies not expended by the Utah Seismic Safety Commission during a fiscal year are nonlapsing except that any balance of General Fund monies greater than $10,000 lapses to the General Fund.

